Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Office of the Governor,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $32,349,279.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Office of the Governor, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $50,000 for the necessary expenses of  the Governor in connection
with the duties imposed by law and for such other expenses as may be incumbent  upon or
requested by the Governor.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,183,879 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Office of the Governor for the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,275,412 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Office of the
Governor.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5523 (SB 5523-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5523 (SB 5523-A) Page 2